Missouri, session 2026, SB1518.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 650.240, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 650.240,
to read as follows:
650.240. The director shall employ deputy inspectors
who shall be responsible to the chief inspector[ and who
shall have had at the time of appointment not less than five
years' experience in the construction, installation,
inspection, operation, maintenance, or repair of high
pressure boilers and pressure vessels as a mechanical
engineer, steam operating engineer, boilermaker, or boiler
inspector, and who shall have passed the examination
provided for in section 650.250].
✓
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.